Tennessee, session 114, HB2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-30-206(a), is amended by
deleting "July 1" wherever it appears and substituting "January 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2379
012386
- 1 -